scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_C.yaml
     aandagim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaandagimaa
     aandagim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaandagimaa
     aandagim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaandagimaan
     aandagim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aandagimaad
     aandagim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaandagimaad
     aandagim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aandagim 
     aandaanziye'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaandaanziye'aa
     aandaanziye'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaandaanziye'aan
     aandaanziye'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aandaanziye'aad
     aandaanziye'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaandaanziye'aad
     aandaanziye'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aandaanziye'
     aandin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaandinaa
     aandin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaandinaan
     aandin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aandinaad 
     aandin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaandinaad
     aandin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aandin 
     aanikoo'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaanikoo'aa
     aanikoo'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaanikoo'aan
     aanikoo'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aanikoo'aad
     aanikoo'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaanikoo'aad
     aanikoo'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aanikoo'
     aanikooshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaanikooshimaa
     aanikooshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaanikooshimaa
     aanikooshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaanikooshimaa
     aanikooshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaanikooshimaan
     aanikooshim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aanikooshimaad
     aanikooshim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaanikooshimaad
     aanikooshim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aanikooshim
     aanimi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaanimi'aa
     aanimi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaanimi'aa
     aanimi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaanimi'aa
     aanimi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaanimi'aan
     aanimi'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aanimi'aad
     aanimi'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaanimi'aad
     aanimi'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aanimi'
     aanimim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: inaanimimaa
     aanimim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninaanimimaa
     aanimim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niaanimimaa
     aanimim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaanimimaan
     aanimim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aanimimaad
     aanimim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaanimimaad
     aanimim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aanimim
     aanishim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaanishimaa
     aanishim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaanishimaa
     aanishim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaanishimaa
     aanishim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaanishimaan
     aanishim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aanishimaad
     aanishim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaanishimaad
     aanishim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aanishim
     aanji'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaanji'aa
     aanji'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaanji'aa
     aanji'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaanji'aa
     aanji'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaanji'aan
     aanji'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aanji'aad
     aanji'+VTA+Particip+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaanji'aad
     aanji'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aanji'
     aanjishim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaanjishimaa
     aanjishim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaanjishimaan
     aanjishim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aanjishimaad
     aanjishim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aanjishim
     aanzikonaye'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaanzikonaye'aa
     aanzikonaye'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaanzikonaye'aa
     aanzikonaye'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaanzikonaye'aa
     aanzikonaye'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaanzikonaye'aan
     aanzikonaye'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aanzikonaye'aad
     aanzikonaye'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaanzikonaye'aad
     aanzikonaye'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aanzikonaye' 
     aanzinaago'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaanzinaago'aa
     aanzinaago'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaanzinaago'aa
     aanzinaago'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaanzinaago'aa
     aanzinaago'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaanzinaago'aan
     aanzinaago'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aanzinaago'aad
     aanzinaago'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaanzinaago'aad
     aanzinaago'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aanzinaago' 
     aasamaateshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaasamaateshimaa
     aasamaateshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaasamaateshimaan
     aasamaateshim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aasamaateshimaad
     aasamaateshim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aasamaateshim
     aasamishim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaasamishimaa
     aasamishim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaasamishimaan
     aasamishim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aasamishimaad
     aasamishim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aasamishim
     aason+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaasonaa
     aason+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: oyaasonaan
     aason+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aasonaad
     aason+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaasonaad
     aason+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aason
     aasoshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaasoshimaa
     aasoshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaasoshimaan
     aasoshim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aasoshimaad
     aasoshim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aasoshim
     aaswaakoshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaaswaakoshimaa
     aaswaakoshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaaswaakoshimaan
     aaswaakoshim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aaswaakoshimaad
     aaswaakoshim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaaswaakoshimaad
     aaswaakoshim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aaswaakoshim
     aatwaakoshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaatwaakoshimaa
     aatwaakoshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaatwaakoshimaa
     aatwaakoshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaatwaakoshimaa
     aatwaakoshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaatwaakoshimaan
     aatwaakoshim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aatwaakoshimaad
     aatwaakoshim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaatwaakoshimaad
     aatwaakoshim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aatwaakoshim
     aatwaakowebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaatwaakowebinaa
     aatwaakowebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaatwaakowebinaa
     aatwaakowebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaatwaakowebinaa
     aatwaakowebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaatwaakowebinaan
     aatwaakowebin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aatwaakowebinaad
     aatwaakowebin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaatwaakowebinaad
     aatwaakowebin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aatwaakowebin
     aawadoom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaawadoomaa
     aawadoom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaawadoomaan
     aawadoom+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aawadoomaad
     aawadoom+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaawadoomaad
     aawadoom+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aawadoom
     aawenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaawenimaa
     aawenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaawenimaa
     aawenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaawenimaa
     aawenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaawenimaan
     aawenim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aawenimaad
     aawenim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaawenimaad
     aawenim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aawenim 
     aazhawaabiigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaazhawaabiiginaa
     aazhawaabiigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaazhawaabiiginaan
     aazhawaabiigin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aazhawaabiiginaad
     aazhawaabiigin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aazhawaabiigin
     aazhawaakoshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaazhawaakoshimaa
     aazhawaakoshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaazhawaakoshimaa
     aazhawaakoshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaazhawaakoshimaa
     aazhawaakoshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaazhawaakoshimaa
     aazhawaakoshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaazhawaakoshimaan
     aazhawaakoshim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aazhawaakoshimaad
     aazhawaakoshim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaazhawaakoshimaad
     aazhawaakoshim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aazhawaakoshim 
